apertium-ga-gd/apertium-ga-gd.ga-full.dix
    <pardef n="Áis/each__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eacha</l>
          <r>each<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>each</l>
          <r>each<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>each</l>
          <r>each<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>each</l>
          <r>each<s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r>each<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igh</l>
          <r>each<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igh</l>
          <r>each<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igh</l>
          <r>each<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sce/art__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arta</l>
          <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>art</l>
          <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>art</l>
          <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irte</l>
          <r>art<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Bé/ar__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="da/bhach__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bhach</l>
          <r>bhach<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bhcha</l>
          <r>bhach<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ibhche</l>
          <r>bhach<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mi/on__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>on<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>on<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ona</l>
          <r>on<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>on</l>
          <r>on<s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="po/st__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ist</l>
          <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ist</l>
          <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="déshúil/igh__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>each</l>
          <r>igh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igh</l>
          <r>igh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="da/ir__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>ir<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>racha</l>
          <r>ir<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rach</l>
          <r>ir<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rach</l>
          <r>ir<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="a/bhinn__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bhainn</l>
          <r>bhinn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bhann</l>
          <r>bhinn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ibhneacha</l>
          <r>bhinn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="i/all__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>élle</l>
          <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>allacha</l>
          <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>allacha</l>
          <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>all</l>
          <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cionr/oinnt__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anna</l>
          <r>oinnt<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>annta</l>
          <r>oinnt<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>annta</l>
          <r>oinnt<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oinnt</l>
          <r>oinnt<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/each__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>each</l>
          <r>each<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r>each<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ithe</l>
          <r>each<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ithe</l>
          <r>each<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="c/ith__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eatha</l>
          <r>ith<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eathanna</l>
          <r>ith<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eathanna</l>
          <r>ith<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ith</l>
          <r>ith<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="mion"><i>mi</i><par n="mi/on__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="neamh-mhion"><i>neamh-mhi</i><par n="mi/on__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cionroinnt"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ionr</i><par n="cionr/oinnt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dainséar"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ainsé</i><par n="Bé/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cith"><par n="initial-c"/><i></i><par n="c/ith__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baictéar"><par n="initial-b"/><i>aicté</i><par n="Bé/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cothaitheach"><par n="initial-c"/><i>othaith</i><par n="Áis/each__n"/></e>
    <e lm="abhainn"><par n="initial-a"/><i></i><par n="a/bhinn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="coiléar"><par n="initial-c"/><i>oilé</i><par n="Bé/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ainéistéiseach"><par n="initial-a"/><i>inéistéis</i><par n="Áis/each__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cónaiféar"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ónaifé</i><par n="Bé/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="éagráifeach"><par n="initial-é"/><i>agráif</i><par n="Áis/each__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dabhach"><par n="initial-d"/><i>a</i><par n="da/bhach__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dair"><par n="initial-d"/><i>a</i><par n="da/ir__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cráitéar"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ráité</i><par n="Bé/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anaróideach"><par n="initial-a"/><i>naróid</i><par n="Áis/each__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diaibéiteach"><par n="initial-d"/><i>iaibéit</i><par n="Áis/each__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aimpéar"><par n="initial-a"/><i>impé</i><par n="Bé/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="daigéar"><par n="initial-d"/><i>aigé</i><par n="Bé/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="déshúiligh"><par n="initial-d"/><i>éshúil</i><par n="déshúil/igh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dramhphost"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ramhpho</i><par n="po/st__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cíléar"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ílé</i><par n="Bé/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="buirgéiseach"><par n="initial-b"/><i>uirgéis</i><par n="Áis/each__n"/></e>
    <e lm="línéar"><i>líné</i><par n="Bé/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="guthphost"><par n="initial-g"/><i>uthpho</i><par n="po/st__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sceart"><par n="initial-s"/><i>ce</i><par n="sce/art__n"/></e>
    <e lm="meitéar"><par n="initial-m"/><i>eité</i><par n="Bé/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="post"><par n="initial-p"/><i>o</i><par n="po/st__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ráipéar"><i>ráipé</i><par n="Bé/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="imirceach"><par n="initial-i"/><i>mirc</i><par n="Áis/each__n"/></e>
    <e lm="seanteach"><par n="initial-s"/><i>eant</i><par n="t/each__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ríomhphost"><i>ríomhpho</i><par n="po/st__n"/></e>
    <e lm="moirtéar"><par n="initial-m"/><i>oirté</i><par n="Bé/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="leathsféar"><i>leathsfé</i><par n="Bé/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="graiméar"><par n="initial-g"/><i>raimé</i><par n="Bé/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="propast"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ropa</i><par n="po/st__n"/></e>
    <e lm="glórphost"><par n="initial-g"/><i>lórpho</i><par n="po/st__n"/></e>
    <e lm="iall"><par n="initial-i"/><i></i><par n="i/all__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lindéar"><i>lindé</i><par n="Bé/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="párpháipéar"><par n="initial-p"/><i>árpháipé</i><par n="Bé/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="móinteach"><par n="initial-m"/><i>óint</i><par n="Áis/each__n"/></e>
    <e lm="saidhbhéar"><par n="initial-s"/><i>aidhbhé</i><par n="Bé/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="saorphost"><par n="initial-s"/><i>aorpho</i><par n="po/st__n"/></e>
    <e lm="iltíreach"><par n="initial-i"/><i>ltír</i><par n="Áis/each__n"/></e>
    <e lm="páipéar"><par n="initial-p"/><i>áipé</i><par n="Bé/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paintéar"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ainté</i><par n="Bé/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slipéar"><par n="initial-s"/><i>lipé</i><par n="Bé/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tairiseach"><par n="initial-t"/><i>airis</i><par n="Áis/each__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stíméar"><par n="initial-s"/><i>tímé</i><par n="Bé/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="teach"><par n="initial-t"/><i></i><par n="t/each__n"/></e>
    <e lm="urphost"><par n="initial-u"/><i>rpho</i><par n="po/st__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Caitliceach"><i>Caitlic</i><par n="Áis/each__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Agaistíneach"><i>Agaistín</i><par n="Áis/each__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Béar"><i>Bé</i><par n="Bé/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Cruithneach"><i>Cruithn</i><par n="Áis/each__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Eilvéiseach"><i>Eilvéis</i><par n="Áis/each__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Féiníceach"><i>Féiníc</i><par n="Áis/each__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Cairibeach"><i>Cairib</i><par n="Áis/each__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Cairmilíteach"><i>Cairmilít</i><par n="Áis/each__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Peirseach"><i>Peirs</i><par n="Áis/each__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Hiteach"><i>Hit</i><par n="Áis/each__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Preispitéireach"><i>Preispitéir</i><par n="Áis/each__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Máigeach"><i>Máig</i><par n="Áis/each__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Veinéiseach"><i>Veinéis</i><par n="Áis/each__n"/></e>
